Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Article 1. Control Generally

§ 11-6-101.
Permission to eradicate upon refusal of entry by property owner.

Whenever predatory animals
become a menace to livestock owned or controlled by any resident of
Wyoming and the owner or lessee of any real estate in the vicinity
where the livestock is ranged or pastured refuses permission to the
owner of the livestock, his agents or employees, to enter upon the
real estate for the purpose of destroying such predatory animals,
entry may be obtained as provided by W.S.

11-6-102

and

11-6-103

.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 16, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 56-2301; W.S. 1957, § 11-74; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-6-102.
Application to county commissioners; hearing; determination; limitation
on use of firearms.

The owner of the livestock
may file a written application with the board of county commissioners
of the county where the real estate is located, applying for permission
to eradicate predatory animals. If, after giving the owner or lessee
an opportunity of a hearing, the county commissioners may grant such
permission, but the person receiving the permission shall not use
firearms in destroying such animals without first obtaining permission
from the owner or lessee of the real estate.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 16, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 56-2302; W.S. 1957, § 11-75; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-6-103.
Liability for damage to property.

The permission granted
shall permit the petitioner to enter upon the real estate but shall
not relieve the petitioner from any damages which he inflicts upon
any property of the owner or lessee of the real estate.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 16, § 3; C.S. 1945, § 56-2303; W.S. 1957, § 11-76; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-6-104.
Department to coordinate control efforts; centralized and coordinated rodent and predator control plan authorized; release of information restricted.

The department shall coordinate control efforts and may contract among agencies and counties for predator control under this chapter. The department may establish and implement a cooperative and coordinated plan for rodent and predator control. It may cooperate with federal agencies in the control of rodents, predatory animals and predacious birds, as defined in W.S.

23-1-101

, which are destructive to livestock, game and poultry, or are detrimental to feed and foodstuffs, crops and forage production and human health. The department may promulgate necessary rules and regulations to carry out the purposes of this section.

Any information regarding the number or nature of rodents or predators legally taken within the state pursuant to this section shall only be released in its aggregate form. The identity of any person legally taking a rodent or predator within this state is solely for the use of the responsible agency or appropriate law enforcement agency, shall not be released without the individual’s written consent and is not a public record for purposes of W.S.

16-4-201

through

16-4-205

.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 63, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 11-77.1; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 2003, ch. 191, § 1; 2022 ch. 63, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added the first sentence in (a).

§ 11-6-105.
Issuance of aerial hunting permits authorized.

The department may issue
permits for the aerial hunting of rodents and predators to any person
for the protection of livestock, domesticated animals or human life,
upon a showing that the person or their designated pilot, along with
the aircraft to be utilized in the aerial hunting, have been licensed
and qualified in accordance with the requirements of the Wyoming aeronautics
commission. The department shall furnish to the game and fish department
a list of the names and addresses of the persons to whom they have
issued aerial permits. The department may predicate the issuance or
retention of such permits upon the recipients’ full and prompt disclosure
of information as the department may request for submission to the
authorities designated in accordance with section 13 of the Fish and
Wildlife Act of 1956 or its successor. The department shall collect
a fee from each person who has any aircraft permitted under this section
on or before April 1 of each year in the amount authorized by W.S.

11-1-104

.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 63, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 11-78.1; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1993, ch. 135, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to aeronautics commission, see §

10-3-101

.

As to game and fish department, see §

23-1-401

et seq.

Fish and Wildlife Act. —

Section 13 of the federal Fish and Wildlife Act of 1956, referred to in the next-to-last sentence, appears as 16 U.S.C. § 742j-l.

§ 11-6-106.
Receiving and expending monies for supplies.

The department may receive
money for rodent and predator control from the federal government,
state appropriations, counties, agencies, boards, associations, commissions,
individuals and any other cooperators and may expend such monies to
purchase supplies, materials, services, and to employ or contract
personnel for rodent and predator control. The department may make
such supplies, materials, services and personnel available to cooperators
at approximate cost.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 63, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 11-81.1; W.S. 1977, §

11-6-107

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-6-107.
Disposition
of proceeds.

All predator furs, skins
and specimens taken by hunters or trappers whose salaries are paid
in full by cooperating agencies, shall be sold and the proceeds returned
to the respective predator management district of the county in which
the furs, skins or specimens originated. All receipts from sales of
materials and services related to predatory animal and rodent control
received by the department shall be paid into the state general fund.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 63, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 11-82.1; Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 2; W.S. 1977, §

11-6-108

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1989, ch. 3, § 1; 2006, ch. 87, § 1.

The 2006 amendment,

substituted “predator management” for “predatory animal.”

Laws 2006, ch. 87, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 23, 2006.

§ 11-6-108.
Cooperative agreements generally.

The department may enter
into cooperative agreements with other governmental agencies, counties,
associations, corporations or individuals for carrying out the purposes
of W.S.

11-6-104

through

11-6-107

.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 77, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 11-79; Laws 1973, ch. 63, § 2; W.S. 1977, §

11-6-106

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.